Mississippi statutes. Title 17. Local Government; Provisions Common to Counties and Municipalities
Chapter 7. Removal of Local Governments in Emergencies

§ 17-7-1.
Removal of sites of government in emergency resulting from natural disaster, enemy attacks, etc.

Whenever, due to an emergency resulting from a natural disaster, the effects of enemy attack, or the anticipated effects of a threatened enemy attack, it becomes imprudent, inexpedient or impossible to conduct the affairs of municipal and county governments or any subdivisions thereof at the regular or usual place or places thereof, the governing body of each political subdivision of this state may meet at any place within or without the territorial limits of such political subdivision on the call of the presiding officer or any two (2) members of such governing body, and shall proceed to establish and designate by ordinance, resolution or other manner, alternate or substitute sites or places as the emergency temporary location, or locations, of government where all, or any part, of the public business may be transacted and conducted during the emergency situation. Such sites or places may be within or without the territorial limits of such political subdivision and may be within or without this state.

For the purposes of this chapter, “natural disaster” means a natural disaster as declared by the Governor.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2874-01; Laws, 1960, ch. 187, § 1; Laws, 2005, 5th Ex Sess, ch. 4, § 1, eff from and after Aug. 29, 2005.

§ 17-7-3.
Exercise of governmental powers at temporary location.

During the period when the public business is being conducted at the emergency temporary location, or locations, the governing body and other officers of municipal and county governments of this state shall have and possess and shall exercise, at such location, or locations, all of the executive, legislative and judicial powers and functions conferred upon such body and officers by or under the laws of this state. Such powers and functions may be exercised in the light of the exigencies of the emergency situation without regard to or compliance with time-consuming procedures and formalities prescribed by law and pertaining thereto, and all acts of such body and officers shall be as valid and binding as if performed within the territorial limits of their political subdivision.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2874-02; Laws, 1960, ch. 187, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).

§ 17-7-5.
Provisions effective notwithstanding conflict with other laws.

The provisions of this chapter shall be effective in the event it shall be employed notwithstanding any statutory charter or ordinance provision to the contrary or in conflict herewith.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2874-03; Laws, 1960, ch. 187, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 11, 1960).